Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-75] Admissibility of records of
courts of inquiry. (a) In any case not extending to the dismissal of a
commissioned officer, the sworn testimony, contained in the duly authenticated
record of proceedings of a court of inquiry, of a person whose oral testimony
cannot be obtained, may, if otherwise admissible under the rules of evidence,
be read in evidence by any party before a court-martial if the accused was a
party before the court of inquiry and if the same issue was involved or if the
accused consents to the introduction of such evidence.

(b) Such testimony may be read in evidence
only by the defense in cases extending to the dismissal of a commissioned
officer.

(c) Such testimony may also be read in
evidence before a court of inquiry or a military board. [L 1982, c 171, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next